Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.137

Community revitalization financing—Public improvements.

In addition to other authority that a metropolitan park district possesses, a metropolitan park district may provide any public improvement as defined under RCW 39.89.020, but this additional authority is limited to participating in the financing of the public improvements as provided under RCW 39.89.050.

This section does not limit the authority of a metropolitan park district to otherwise participate in the public improvements if that authority exists elsewhere.

[ 2001 c 212 s 12.]